Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1811YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 216 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 1 CARE CENTERS ââ LIABILITY INSURANCE. The department of health 2 and human services shall promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 3 17A to require a child care center that employs a person under 4 the age of eighteen who provides child care or substitute child 5 care to school-age children without additional supervision 6 to provide documentation to the department of professional 7 liability insurance coverage for such employees. For the 8 purposes of this section, âchild careâ and âchild care centerâ 9 mean the same as defined in section 237A.1. 10